Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 3. Management of the Common Interest Community

§ 3-101.
Organization of unit owners’ association.

A unit owners’ association shall be organized no later than the date the first unit in the common interest community is conveyed. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all unit owners or, following termination of the common interest community, of all former unit owners entitled to distributions of proceeds, or their heirs, successors, or assigns. The association must have an executive board. The association shall be organized as a profit or nonprofit corporation, trust, limited liability company, partnership, unincorporated association, or any other form of organization authorized by the law of this state.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-102.
Powers of unit owners’ association.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section and other provisions of this title, the association:

shall adopt and may amend bylaws and may adopt and amend rules;

shall adopt and may amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves under section 3-123 of this title, may collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners, and may invest funds of the association;

may hire and discharge managing agents and other employees, agents, and independent contractors;

may initiate, defend, or intervene in litigation, arbitration, mediation, or administrative proceedings in its name on behalf of itself or two or more unit owners on matters affecting the common interest community, subject to section 3-124 of this title;

may make contracts and incur liabilities;

may regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements;

may make additional improvements to the common elements;

may acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its name any right, title, or interest to real estate or personal property, except as provided by section 3-112 of this title;

may grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements;

may impose and receive payments, fees, or charges:

for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements, other than limited common elements described in subdivisions 2-102(2) and (4) of this title, and

for services provided to unit owners;

may impose charges for late payment of assessments and, after notice and a hearing, may impose reasonable fines for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules of the association;

may impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration, resale certificates required by section 4-109 of this title, or statements of unpaid assessments;

may provide indemnification for its officers and executive board and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;

except to the extent limited by the declaration, may assign its right to future income, including the right to receive assessments;

may exercise any other power conferred by the declaration or bylaws or that is legally provided for similar entities or that is necessary and proper to govern and operate the association;

may require that disputes between the executive board and unit owners or between two or more unit owners regarding the common interest community must be submitted to nonbinding alternative dispute resolution as a prerequisite to commencement of a judicial proceeding;

may exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this State by organizations of the same type as the association; and

may suspend any right or privilege of a unit owner that fails to pay an assessment, but may not:

except as otherwise provided in subsection 3-116(q) of this title, deny a unit owner or other occupant access to the owner’s unit;

suspend a unit owner’s right to vote;

prevent a unit owner from seeking election as a director or officer of the association; or

withhold services provided to a unit or a unit owner by the association if the effect of withholding the service would be to endanger the health, safety, or property of any person.

The declaration may not limit the power of the association beyond the limit authorized in subdivision (a)(18) of this section to:

deal with the declarant if the limit is more restrictive than the limit imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons; or

institute litigation or an arbitration, mediation, or administrative proceeding against any person, subject to the following:

the association shall comply with section 3-124 of this title, if applicable, before instituting any proceeding described in subsection 3-124(a) of this title in connection with construction defects; and

the executive board promptly shall provide notice to the unit owners of any legal proceeding in which the association is a party other than proceedings involving enforcement of rules or to recover unpaid assessments or other sums due the association.

[Repealed.]

If a tenant of a unit owner violates the declaration, bylaws, or rules of the association, in addition to exercising any of its powers against the unit owner, the association may:

exercise directly against the tenant the powers described in subdivision (a)(11) of this section;

after giving notice to the tenant and the unit owner and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable fines against the tenant for the violation; and

enforce any other rights against the tenant for the violation that the unit owner as landlord could lawfully have exercised under the lease or that the association could lawfully have exercised directly against the unit owner, or both.

The rights referred to in subdivision (d)(3) of this section may be exercised only if the tenant or unit owner fails to cure the violation within 10 days after the association notifies the tenant and unit owner of that violation.

Unless a lease otherwise provides, this section does not:

affect rights that the unit owner has to enforce the lease or that the association has under other law; or

permit the association to enforce a lease to which it is not a party in the absence of a violation of the declaration, bylaws, or rules.

The executive board may determine whether to take enforcement action by exercising the association’s power to impose sanctions or commencing an action for a violation of the declaration, bylaws, and rules, including whether to compromise any claim for unpaid assessments or other claim made by or against it. The executive board does not have a duty to take enforcement action if it determines that, under the facts and circumstances presented:

the association’s legal position does not justify taking any or further enforcement action;

the covenant, restriction, or rule being enforced is or is likely to be construed as inconsistent with law;

although a violation may exist or may have occurred, it is not so material as to be objectionable to a reasonable person or to justify expending the association’s resources; or

it is not in the association’s best interests to pursue an enforcement action.

The executive board’s decision under subsection (g) of this section not to pursue enforcement under one set of circumstances does not prevent the executive board from taking enforcement action under another set of circumstances, but the executive board may not be arbitrary or capricious in taking enforcement action.

The executive board shall establish a reasonable method for unit owners to communicate among themselves and with the executive board on matters concerning the association.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 55

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Jan. 1, 2012;

2013, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-103.
Executive board members and officers.

Except as otherwise provided in the declaration, bylaws, subsection (b) of this section, or other provisions of this title, the executive board acts on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, officers and members of the executive board appointed by the declarant shall exercise the degree of care and loyalty required of a trustee. Officers and members of the executive board not appointed by the declarant shall exercise the degree of care and loyalty to the association required of an officer or director of a corporation organized, and are subject to the conflict of interest rules governing directors and officers, under Title 11B. The standards of care and loyalty described in this section apply regardless of the form in which the association is organized.

The executive board shall not:

amend the declaration, except as provided in section 2-117 of this title;

amend the bylaws;

terminate the common interest community;

elect members of the executive board, but may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term, or, if earlier, until the next regularly scheduled election of executive board members; or

determine the qualifications, powers, duties, or terms of office of executive board members.

The executive board shall adopt budgets as provided in section 3-123 of this title.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section, the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association during which a declarant or the declarant’s designee may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before the period ends. In that event, the declarant may require during the remainder of the period that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective. Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, and except as provided in subsection 2-123(g) of this title, a period of declarant control shall terminate on the earliest of:
(d) (1) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association during which a declarant or the declarant’s designee may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before the period ends. In that event, the declarant may require during the remainder of the period that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective. Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, and except as provided in subsection 2-123(g) of this title, a period of declarant control shall terminate on the earliest of:

60 days after three-fourths of the created units is conveyed to unit owners other than a declarant;

two years after all declarants have ceased to offer units for sale in the ordinary course of business;

two years after any development right to add new units is last exercised; or

the day the declarant, after giving notice in a record to unit owners, records an instrument voluntarily surrendering all rights to control activities of the association.

[Repealed.]

At least one-fourth of the members of the executive board shall be elected by unit owners who are not declarants within 60 days after one-fourth of the created units is conveyed to owners other than a declarant. At least one-third of the executive board shall be elected by unit owners who are not declarants within 60 days after one-half of the created units is conveyed to unit owners other than declarants.

Except in elections pursuant to subsection 2-120(e) of this title, before the termination of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect an executive board of at least three members, of which a majority shall be unit owners. Unless the declaration provides for the election of officers by the unit owners, the executive board shall elect its officers who shall take office upon election or appointment.

A declaration may provide for the appointment of specified positions on the executive board by persons other than the declarant during or after the period of declarant control. It also may provide a method for filling vacancies in those positions, other than by election by the unit owners. However, after the period of declarant control, appointed members:

may not make up more than one-third of the board; and

have no greater authority than any other member of the board.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-104.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

A special declarant right may be transferred only by an instrument executed by the transferee and recorded in each municipality in which any portion of the common interest community is located.

Upon transfer of a special declarant right, the liabilities are as follows:

A transferor remains liable for obligations and actions arising before the transfer of special declarant rights and warranty obligations imposed by this title. Lack of privity does not deprive any unit owner of standing to bring an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If a successor to a special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant, the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligations or liabilities of the successor relating to the common interest community.

If a transferor retains special declarant rights, but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor remains liable in regard to the retained special declarant rights.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument, deed of trust, or other agreement creating a security interest, in case of foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under bankruptcy code or receivership proceedings, of any units owned by a declarant or real estate in a common interest community subject to development rights, a person acquiring title to all the property being foreclosed or sold, but only upon his or her request, succeeds to all special declarant rights related to that property held by that declarant, or only to any rights reserved in the declaration pursuant to section 2-115 of this title and held by that declarant to maintain models, sales offices, and signs. The judgment or instrument conveying title must provide for transfer of only the special declarant rights requested.

Upon foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under bankruptcy code or receivership proceedings, of all interest in a common interest community owned by a declarant:

the declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights, and

the period of declarant control (subsection 3-103(d) of this title) terminates unless the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights held by that declarant to a successor declarant.

The liabilities and obligations of a person who succeeds to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this title or by the declaration.

A successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in subdivision (3) or (4) of this subsection or a successor who is an affiliate of a declarant, is subject to the obligations and liabilities imposed by this title or the declaration:

on a declarant which relate to the successor’s exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights; or

on his or her transferor, other than:

misrepresentations by any previous declarant;

warranty obligations on improvements made by any previous declarant, or made before the common interest community was created;

breach of any fiduciary obligation by any previous declarant or his or her appointees to the executive board; or

any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain models, sales offices, and signs (section 2-115 of this title), may not exercise any other special declarant right, and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant, except the obligation to provide a public offering statement and any liability arising as a result thereof.

A successor to all special declarant rights held by a transferor who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed or other instrument of conveyance in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title under subsection (c) of this section, may declare in a recorded instrument the intention to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any unit or real estate subject to development rights owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than any right held by his or her transferor to control the executive board in accordance with subsection 3-103(d) of this title for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant may not exercise special declarant rights under this subsection, the successor declarant is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for his or her acts and omissions under subsection 3-103(d) of this title.

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant, other than claims and obligations arising under this title or the declaration.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section deals with the issue of the extent to which obligations and liabilities imposed upon a declarant by this Act are transferred to a third party by a transfer of the declarant’s interest in a common interest community. There are two parts to the problem. First, what obligations and liabilities to unit owners (both existing and future) should a declarant retain, notwithstanding his transfer of interests. Second, what obligations and liabilities may fairly be imposed upon the declarant’s successor in interest.

This section strikes a balance between the obvious need to protect the interests of unit owners and the equally important need to protect innocent successors to a declarant’s rights, especially persons such as mortgagees whose only interest in the project is to protect their debt security. The general scheme of the section is to impose upon a declarant continuing obligations and liabilities for promises, acts, or omissions undertaken during the period that he was in control of the community, while relieving a declarant who transfers all or part of his special declarant rights in a project of such responsibilities with respect to the promises, acts, or omissions of a successor over whom he has no control. Similarly, the section absolves a non-affiliated transferee of responsibility for the promises, acts, or omissions of a transferor declarant over which he had no control. Finally, the section makes special provision for the interests of certain successor declarants (e.g., a mortgagee who succeeds to the rights of the declarant pursuant to a “deed in lieu of foreclosure” and who holds the project solely for transfer to another person) by relieving such persons of virtually all of the obligations and liabilities imposed upon declarants by this Act.

Subsection (a) provides that a successor in interest to a declarant may acquire the special rights of the declarant only by recording an instrument which reflects a transfer of those rights. This recordation requirement is important to determine the duration of the period of declarant control pursuant to Section 3-103(d) and (e), as well as to place unit owners on notice of all persons entitled to exercise the special rights of a declarant under this Act. The transfer by a declarant of all of his interest in a project to a successor without a concomitant transfer of the special rights of a declarant pursuant to this subsection, results in the automatic termination of such special declarant rights and of any period of declarant control.

Under subsection (b), a transferor declarant remains liable to unit owners (both existing and future) for all obligations and liabilities, including warranty obligations on all improvements made by him, arising prior to the transfer. If a declarant transfers any special declarant right to an affiliate (as defined in Section 1-103(1)), the transferor remains subject to all liabilities specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) and, in addition, is jointly and severally liable with his successor in interest for all obligations and liabilities of the successor.

The obligations and liabilities imposed upon transferee declarants under the Act are set forth in subsection (e). In general, a transferee declarant (other than an affiliate of the original declarant and other than a successor by foreclosure or conveyance in lieu of foreclosure) becomes subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed upon a declarant by the Act or by the declaration with respect to any promises, acts, or omissions undertaken subsequent to the transfer which relate to the rights he holds. Such a transferee also is liable for the promises, acts, or omissions of the original declarant undertaken prior to the transfer, except as set forth in paragraph (e)(2)(ii). For example, because of the exclusions in (e)(2)(ii), a successor declarant would not be liable for the warranty obligations of the original declarant with respect to improvements to the project made by the original declarant. Similarly, a successor would not be liable, under normal circumstances, for any misrepresentation or breach of fiduciary duty by the original declarant prior to the transfer. The successor is liable, however to complete improvements which the developer is obligated to complete under Section 4-119.

To preclude declarants from evading their obligations and liabilities under this Act by transferring their interests to affiliated companies, paragraph (1) of subsection (e) makes clear that any successor declarant who is an affiliate of the original declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed upon the original declarant by the Act or by the declaration. Similarly, as previously noted, paragraph (2) of subsection (b) provides that an original declarant who transfers his rights to an affiliate remains jointly and severally liable with his successor for all obligations and liabilities imposed upon declarants by the Act or by the declaration.

The section handles the problem of certain successor declarants (i.e., persons whose sole interest in the project is the protection of debt security) in three ways. First, subsection (c) provides that, in the case of a foreclosure of a security interest or a sale by a trustee in bankruptcy of any units owned by a declarant, any person acquiring title to all of the units being foreclosed or sold may request the transfer of special declarant rights. In that event, and only upon such request, such rights will be transferred in the instrument conveying title to the units and such transferee will thereafter become a successor declarant subject to the other provisions of this section. In the event of a foreclosure, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or sale by a trustee in bankruptcy of all units owned by a declarant, if the transferee of such units does not request the transfer of special declarant rights then, under subsection (d), those special declarant rights cease to exist and any period of declarant control terminates.

A declarant may wish to transfer special declarant rights as a part of his transfer to another person of units already constructed in a cooperative.
If the declaration has specified that units are personal property, the transfer of the units themselves will be personal property transfers not subject to the real estate recording act.
However, under subsection (a), if special declarant rights are to be transferred, that transfer must be evidenced by an instrument recorded in every county in which the cooperative lies.
The intent of that provision is that the recording be in the land records and identify the real estate involved so that a title examination relating to the land in the cooperative would reveal the transfer of the special declarant right.

In a common interest community, a mortgage recorded prior to the recordation of the declaration would have priority over any rights of declarants or unit owners arising under the declaration.
However, under Section 2-118(k) and (l), foreclosure of such a mortgage does not automatically terminate the effectiveness of a condominium or planned community declaration; the declaration becomes ineffective as to the land covered by the prior mortgage only if the purchaser at the foreclosure sale records an instrument excluding the real estate from the condominium or planned community.
If the purchaser on the foreclosure of the prior mortgage elects to have the real estate remain in the condominium or planned community, it becomes a successor declarant subject to the general rules of this section, including those applicable to persons who acquire special declarant rights by virtue of foreclosure sales (subsection c).

However, under the Act, foreclosure of a mortgage which is prior to a cooperative declaration automatically removes the real estate from the cooperative since there is nothing in the Act which would change the ordinary rule that the foreclosure of a mortgage which is prior to any restrictive covenants or easements results in a transfer free of those “junior interests.”
(See Section 2-118(k) and (l).)

Therefore, in the absence of some contractual arrangement between the mortgagee and the association under which the buyer at the foreclosure sale has a right to reconvey the property to the association, the purchaser at the foreclosure sale could not succeed to any development rights of the declarant since the property would be removed from the cooperative by the foreclosure sale itself.
However, there is nothing in the act which would preclude the developer from having the association contractually obligate itself to retake title to foreclosed property on specified terms.
If the underlying mortgage is of the entire cooperative property, there would probably be no advantage in such an arrangement since the foreclosing mortgagee with the entire project could set up his own cooperative association and undertake new marketing efforts without regard to the obligations and liabilities of the prior cooperative association.
If, on the other hand, the mortgage is on only a portion of the cooperative project there may be distinct advantage in giving the purchaser at the foreclosure sale the power to reconvey the property to the association and having the purchaser become owner of the units which would exist or could be created in the property.
In such a case, the position of the mortgagee would be essentially the same as that of a declarant who acquires the special declarant right to add additional land to the cooperative.

If the developer, while in control of the cooperative association, has had the cooperative association grant a mortgage in its real estate and has subordinated the declaration to the mortgage, the situation is the same as that just described: on foreclosure, that real estate would no longer be a part of the cooperative.
Again, in the ordinary case no special declarant rights could pass to the purchaser at the foreclosure sale since he would not have any real estate in the cooperative.
If, however, the association is obligated to accept a reconveyance of the real estate which has been foreclosed the purchaser at the foreclosure sale would have special declarant rights as just described.

If the declarant in a cooperative has given a mortgage or security interest in his own special declarant rights or in his unsold units, purchasers at the foreclosure sale would acquire rights as to property still in the cooperative and would therefore be able to succeed to the declarant’s special declarant rights.

Second, any person who succeeds to special declarant rights as a result of the transfers just described, or by a conveyance in lieu of foreclosure, may, pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (e), declare his intention (in a recorded instrument) to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person.
Thereafter, such a successor may transfer all special declarant rights to a third party acquiring title to any units owned by the successor but may not, prior to such transfer, exercise any special declarant rights other than the right to control the executive board of the association in accordance with the provisions of Section 3-103(c).
A successor declarant who holds special declarant rights solely for transfer is relieved of any liability under the Act except liability for any acts or omissions related to his control of the executive board of the association.
This provision is designed to deal with the typical problem of a foreclosing lender who opts to bid in and obtain the project at the foreclosure sale solely for the purpose of subsequent resale. It permits a foreclosing lender to undertake such a transaction without incurring the full burden of declarant obligations and liabilities.
At the same time, the provision recognizes the need for continuing operation of the association and, to that end, permits a foreclosing lender to assume control of the association for the purpose of ensuring a smooth transition.

Third, paragraph (3) of subsection (e) provides that a successor who has only the right to maintain model units, sales offices, and signs does not thereby become subject to any obligations or liabilities as a declarant, except for the obligation to provide a public offering statement and any liability resulting therefrom.
This provision also is designed to protect mortgage lenders and contemplates the situation where a lender takes over a project and desires to sell out existing units without making any additional improvements to the project.
This provision facilitates such a transaction by relieving the mortgage lender, in that instance, from the full burden of obligations and liabilities ordinarily imposed upon a declarant under the Act.

Under Section 2-110, a declarant may reserve the right to create additional units in portions of a common interest community which were originally designated as common elements, even though, in a condominium, rights of unit owners have otherwise attached to the common elements, and even though, in a planned community or cooperative, the common elements have been conveyed to the association.
The declarant, upon creation, becomes the owner of any units created.
The right to create the units is an interest in land which may be sold or in which a security interest may be granted.
If the mortgagee of that interest forecloses, the purchaser at the foreclosure sale has the choices concerning development rights and resulting liability which are described in the preceding paragraph.
That is, under subsections (c) and (d), the purchaser may limit his liability by agreeing to hold the developments only for the purpose of transfer as provided by paragraph (e)(4) or may buy the rights under paragraph (c).

§ 3-105.
Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

Within two years after the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to subsection 3-103(f) of this title takes office, the association may terminate without penalty, upon at least 90 days’ notice to the other party, any of the following if entered into before the executive board was elected:

any management, maintenance, operations, or employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities; or

any other contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant.

At any time after the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to subsection 3-103(f) of this title takes office, the association may terminate without penalty, upon at least 90 days’ notice to the other party, any contract or lease that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the unit owners at the time the contract was entered into.

This section does not apply to a lease which if terminated would terminate the common interest community or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to that lease was included in the common interest community for the purpose of avoiding the right of the association to terminate a lease under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-106.
Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association shall:

provide the number of members of the executive board and the titles of the officers of the association;

provide for election by the executive board or, if the declaration requires, by the unit owners, of a president, treasurer, secretary, and any other officers the bylaws specify;

specify the qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing executive board members and officers and filling vacancies;

specify the powers that the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

specify the officers who may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association;

establish the frequency of association meetings, which in no case shall be less than one per year;

establish the number of voters constituting a quorum, which shall not be less than 20 percent of the persons entitled to vote for the executive board. Proxy votes may be included for a quorum;

specify a method for the unit owners to amend the bylaws;

contain any other provisions necessary to satisfy requirements of this title or the declaration concerning meetings, voting, quorums, and other activities of the association; and

provide for any matter required by the laws of this state other than this title that is required to appear in the bylaws of organizations of the same type as the association.

Subject to the declaration and this title, the bylaws may provide for any other necessary or appropriate matters, including matters that could be adopted as rules.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-107.
Upkeep of common interest community.

Except to the extent provided by the declaration and subsections 3-113(b) and (h) of this title, the association shall be responsible for maintenance, repair and replacement of the common elements, and each unit owner shall be responsible for the maintenance, repair and replacement of his or her unit. Each unit owner shall provide to the association and the other unit owners, their agents or employees, access through his or her unit reasonably necessary for those purposes. A unit owner or association is liable for the prompt repair of any damages caused to the common elements or to any unit through which access was taken.

In addition to the liability that a declarant as a unit owner has under this title, the declarant alone is liable for all expenses in connection with real estate subject to development rights. No other unit owner and no other portion of the common interest community is subject to a claim for payment of those expenses. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any income or proceeds from real estate subject to development rights inures to the declarant.

In a planned community, if all development rights have expired with respect to any real estate, the declarant remains liable for all expenses of that real estate unless, upon expiration, the declaration provides that the real estate becomes common elements or units.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The Act permits the declaration to separate maintenance responsibility from ownership. This is commonly done in practice. In the absence of any provision in the declaration, maintenance responsibility follows ownership of the unit or rests with the association in the case of common elements. Under this Act, limited common elements (which might include, for example, patios, balconies, and parking spaces) are common elements. See Section 1-103(19). As a result, under subsection (a), unless the declaration provides that unit owners are responsible for the upkeep of such limited common elements, the association will be responsible for their maintenance. Under Section 3-115(c), the cost of maintenance, repair, and replacement for such limited common elements is assessed against all the units in the common interest community, unless the declaration provides for such expenses to be paid only by the units benefitted. See Comment 1 to Section 2-108.

Under Section 2-110, a declarant may reserve the right to create units in portions of the common interest community originally designated as common elements. However, under Section 3-107(b), the developer is obligated to pay all of the expenses of (including real estate taxes properly apportionable to) that real estate even though, in the case of a planned community or cooperative, it has been conveyed to the association. As to real estate taxes, see Section 1-105(c).